Utah statutes.
77-20-5.   Qualifications of sureties -- Justification -- Requirements of
undertaking.
(1)  The sureties on written undertakings shall be real or personal property
holders within the state.  The qualifications and bonding limits of bail bond
sureties who are engaged in the for-profit, commercial business of posting
property bonds shall be established by the Bail Bond Surety Oversight Board
and rules adopted by the insurance commissioner.  All other sureties shall
collectively have a net worth of at least twice the amount of the undertaking,
exclusive of property exempt from execution.
(2)  Each surety shall justify by affidavit upon the undertaking and each may
be further examined upon oath by the magistrate or by the prosecuting attorney
in the presence of a magistrate, in respect to his property and net worth.
(3)  The undertaking shall, in addition to other requirements, provide that
each surety submits himself to the jurisdiction of the court and irrevocably
appoints the clerk of the court as his agent upon whom any papers affecting
his liability on the undertaking may be served, and that his liability may be
enforced on motion and upon such notice as the court may require without the
necessity of an independent action.
